Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1722
Assignment; statement of amount.

(1)
If no hearing is requested by the obligor, (2) if after a hearing the department
determines that the assignment should go into effect, (3) in cases in which
the court has ordered income withholding pursuant to subsection (1) of section
43-1718.01, or (4) in cases in which the court has ordered income withholding
pursuant to section 43-1718.02, which case subsequently becomes one in which
services are being provided under Title IV-D of the federal Social Security
Act, as amended, the county attorney, the authorized attorney, or the department
shall state the amount to be withheld
from the obligor's disposable income. Such amount shall not in any case exceed
the maximum amount permitted to be withheld under section 303(b) of the federal
Consumer Credit Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. 1673(b)(2)(A) and (B), and the amount
withheld, including interest, to
satisfy an arrearage of child, spousal, or medical support or any monetary judgment when added to the amount
withheld to pay current support and the fee provided for in section 43-1723
shall not exceed such maximum amount.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 42;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 31;

Laws 1993, LB 523, § 16;

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 69;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 13;

Laws 2010, LB712, § 34.